Wyoming, session 2025, SF0076.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 19-13-503 through 19-13-506 and
34-15-201 through 34-15-203 are created to read:
SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163

19-13-503. Conveyances to prohibited foreign parties;
authority; rulemaking.

The office of homeland security shall review and
investigate conveyances that require approval under W.S.
19-13-504 through 19-13-506 to prevent prohibited foreign
parties from gaining access or proximity to critical
infrastructure. The director shall promulgate any rules
necessary to implement W.S. 19-13-504 through 19-13-506.

19-13-504. Conveyances to prohibited foreign parties;
application; form; initial determination; review and
investigation period.

(a) On and after July 1, 2025, a prohibited foreign
party seeking a conveyance in the state of Wyoming shall
apply to the office of homeland security for approval of
the conveyance, except as provided in W.S. 19-13-506.

(b) An application for approval of a conveyance shall
be in a form and manner prescribed by the office of
homeland security and shall include all of the following:
SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163

(i) The name and complete legal address of the
prohibited foreign party filing the application;

(ii) The name and complete legal address of each
party seeking to hold an interest in the real property;

(iii) A description of each party's proposed
interest in the real property;

(iv) The location of the real property;

(v) The current and intended use of the real
property;

(vi) All documents provided in any review of the
conveyance conducted by the committee on foreign investment
in the United States;

(vii) Any other documentation or information the
office of homeland security deems necessary.

SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
(c) After receipt of an application, the office of
homeland security shall determine if the applicant is a
prohibited foreign party and if the real property subject
to conveyance is located on, within or partially within a
critical infrastructure zone. Any conveyance to a
prohibited foreign party of real property located on,
within or partially within a critical infrastructure zone
shall require approval by the office of homeland security,
except as provided in W.S. 19-13-506. Not later than ninety
(90) days after receipt of an application, the office of
homeland security shall notify the applicant in writing
whether the conveyance requires its approval. The date the
applicant is notified that a conveyance requires approval
shall commence the review and investigation period for the
conveyance of real property.

(d) The review and investigation period for the
conveyance of real property shall not exceed one hundred
eighty (180) days, except as provided in this subsection
and subsection (e) of this section. Upon good cause, the
office of homeland security may reserve an additional
ninety (90) days for review and investigation. Upon written
request from an applicant specifying the need for an
SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
accelerated review, the office of homeland security may
expedite its review and investigation.

(e) The office of homeland security shall not approve
or deny a conveyance that is a covered transaction under
the jurisdiction and review of the committee on foreign
investment in the United States, as provided by 50 U.S.C.
Section 4565, until final action for the covered
transaction is complete. This subsection shall not prohibit
the office of homeland security from conducting review or
investigation of a conveyance or reporting information to
the committee on foreign investment in the United States.

19-13-505. Conveyances to prohibited foreign parties;
authority to investigate; factors for approval; letters of
approval; appeal.

(a) The office of homeland security, the attorney
general and the division of criminal investigation may take
any action authorized by law to review and investigate a
conveyance that requires approval by the office of homeland
security. Any investigation and information obtained during
the review and investigation shall not be considered a
SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
public record and shall not be open to public inspection
but may be released to any other state or federal
governmental entity when necessary to protect the public
interest.

(b) In determining whether to approve or deny a
conveyance of real property, the office of homeland
security shall consider the following factors:

(i) The proposed ownership or controlling
interests of the real property subject to conveyance;

(ii) The potential impact of the conveyance to
state security or critical infrastructure;

(iii) The proximity of the real property subject
to conveyance to any critical infrastructure;

(iv) Any other factor reasonably related to the
protection of state security or critical infrastructure
that is deemed relevant by the office of homeland security.

SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
(c) The director shall issue an applicant an approval
letter for a conveyance subject to the approval of the
office of homeland security if any of the following
conditions are met:

(i) The office of homeland security determines
the conveyance does not pose a risk to state security or
critical infrastructure;

(ii) The office of homeland security failed
without good cause to complete the review and investigation
of a conveyance during the review and investigation period;

(iii) The applicant is issued a safe harbor with
respect to a covered transaction, as described in 31 C.F.R.
§ 800.508(d) and section 7(f) of presidential executive
order 11858, as amended, for the same conveyance.

(d) The director shall notify an applicant in writing
if the office of homeland security denies an application
for the conveyance.

SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
(e) Upon notification that a conveyance does not
require the approval of the office of homeland security or
upon the issuance of an approval letter, a conveyance shall
not be subject to any further review or investigation under
W.S. 19-13-503 through 19-13-506 unless the applicant
provided false or misleading information to the office of
homeland security, omitted material information in its
application or is subject to W.S. 19-13-506(b).

(f) An applicant may appeal the denial of a
conveyance by the office of homeland security in accordance
with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

19-13-506. Conveyances to prohibited foreign parties;
exception for resident aliens.

(a) A prohibited foreign party who is a resident
alien shall have the right to be conveyed real property in
the state of Wyoming upon the same terms as a citizen of
the United States during the continuance of the alien's
residence in the state of Wyoming.

SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
(b) If a party exempted under subsection (a) of this
section ceases to be a resident alien or to have residence
in the state of Wyoming, and the party acquired real
property on or after July 1, 2025, the prohibited foreign
party's interest in the real property shall require
approval by the office of homeland security in the manner
provided for a conveyance under W.S. 19-13-503 through
19-13-505 and may be subject to divestiture as provided in
W.S. 34-15-201 through 34-15-203.

ARTICLE 2
CONVEYANCES NEAR CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE

34-15-201. Definitions.

The definitions in W.S. 19-13-501 shall apply to this
article.

34-15-202. Conveyances to prohibited foreign parties
near critical infrastructure zones; prohibition;
violations; enforcement.

SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
(a) On and after July 1, 2025, no conveyance of real
property located on, within or partially within a critical
infrastructure zone shall be made to a prohibited foreign
party unless the prohibited foreign party obtains an
approval letter from the office of homeland security if
required under W.S. 19-13-503 through 19-13-506.

(b) A prohibited foreign party that is conveyed real
property in the state of Wyoming on or after July 1, 2025
in violation of subsection (a) of this section shall divest
of the real property that is the subject of the conveyance
within an amount of time determined reasonable in rule of
the office of homeland security for different classes of
real property. The office of homeland security shall
provide notice to the prohibited foreign party stating that
the party is in violation of this section and specifying
the date by which divestiture shall be complete. When the
prohibited foreign party voluntarily divests of the real
property either before or after receiving notice from the
office of homeland security or when the prohibited foreign
party's interest is involuntarily divested under subsection
(c) of this section, the proceeds of any conveyance of the
real property, together with the proceeds of any conveyance
SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
of personal property on or within the real property, shall
be held in escrow by the office of state lands and
investments until satisfactory arrangements are made by the
prohibited foreign party to compromise, satisfy and pay any
liens on the real property. Any remaining proceeds shall be
remitted to the prohibited foreign party.

(c) If a prohibited foreign party does not divest of
the real property within the time required by subsection
(a) of this section, the attorney general shall commence an
action for divestiture in a court of appropriate
jurisdiction to enforce this section. If the court
determines that the real property interest is held in
violation of law, the court shall order that the real
property be sold at auction.

(d) The proceeds of any sale at auction of real
property ordered by a court under subsection (c) of this
section shall be disbursed to lien holders, in the order of
priority, except for liens which under the terms of any
sale are to remain on the real property. Any remaining
proceeds shall be remitted to the prohibited foreign party.

SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
(e) When pursuing an action for divestiture under
subsection (c) of this section, the attorney general shall
promptly record a copy of the following with the county
clerk in the county where the real property is located:

(i) Notice of the pendency of an action brought
under this section;

(ii) Any court order for the sale of the real
property under this section.

34-15-203. Validity of title.

Title to real property shall not be invalid or subject to
divestiture due to a violation of this article by any
former owner or by another person holding or owning a
former interest in the real property.

Section 2. W.S. 19-13-105(c) by creating a new
paragraph (viii), 19-13-501(a)(i), (iv) and by creating new
paragraphs (vi) through (xii), 19-13-502(d) and (e),
39-13-103(b)(viii) and 39-13-107(b)(i)(C) are amended to
read:
SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163

19-13-105. Homeland security program.

(c) The director is the administrative head of the
Wyoming office of homeland security. In addition to the
duties described in W.S. 19-13-104(d) the director:

(viii) Shall, in conjunction with the attorney
general, enforce the prohibition specified in W.S.
34-15-202(a) for the conveyance of real property to a
prohibited foreign party that is located on, within or
partially within a critical infrastructure zone unless the
prohibited foreign party obtains an approval letter from
the office of homeland security if required under W.S.
19-13-503 through 19-13-506.

19-13-501. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Conveyance" and "conveyance of real
property" means as defined by W.S. 34-1-102 and includes
conveyances of real property, surface interests, mineral
SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
interests and pore space interests every instrument in
writing by which any interest in real property is created,
alienated, mortgaged, leased or assigned, or by which the
title to any real property may be affected in law or in
equity. "Conveyance" shall not include wills;

(iv) "Designated country or person Foreign
adversary" means:

(A) A foreign government or foreign
nongovernment person now or in the future determined to be
a foreign adversary by the United States secretary of
commerce and specified in 15 C.F.R. 7.4(a) 15 C.F.R.
791.4(a);

(B) A country or government now or in the
future designated as a state sponsor of terrorism by the
United States secretary of state under the federal Export
Administration Act of 1979, the Foreign Assistance Act of
1961, the Arms Export Control Act or any other provision of
federal law.

SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
(vi) "Foreign government" means any government
other than the United States federal government or any
government of a state, territory, district or political
subdivision thereof;

(vii) "Party" means any natural person, business
entity, corporation, company, association, firm,
partnership, society, joint-stock company, trust, estate or
any other legal entity;

(viii) "Prohibited foreign party" means:

(A) A citizen or resident of a foreign
adversary, who is not a citizen of the United States;

(B) A foreign government formed within a
foreign adversary;

(C) A party other than a natural person or
a government, that is created or organized under the laws
of a foreign government within a foreign adversary;

SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
(D) Any party other than a natural person
or a government:

(I) That is created or organized under
the laws of any state of the United States; and

(II) In which a significant interest
or substantial control is directly or indirectly held or is
capable of being exercised by any one (1) or more of the
following:

(1) A citizen or resident of a
foreign adversary, who is not a citizen of the United
States;

(2) A foreign government formed
within a foreign adversary;

(3) A party other than a natural
person or a government, that is created or organized under
the laws of a foreign government within a foreign
adversary.

SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
(E) An agent, trustee, subsidiary or other
fiduciary of a person or entity enumerated in subparagraphs
(A) through (D) of this paragraph.

(ix) "Real property" means all interests in land
and appurtenances, including structures, affixed thereto,
and any intangible characteristic that contributes to the
fair market value thereof. "Real property" includes surface
interests, mineral interests and pore space interests;

(x) "Residence" means a natural person's
principal dwelling place where the person intends to remain
permanently for an indefinite period of time;

(xi) "Resident alien" means a natural person who
is not a citizen of the United States and is a resident of
a state, territory, trusteeship or protectorate of the
United States;

(xii) "Significant interest" or "substantial
control" means an interest of any of the following:

SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
(A) Twenty-five percent (25%) or more held
by a natural person referred to in subparagraph (viii)(A)
of this subsection, a foreign government referred to in
subparagraph (viii)(B) of this subsection or a party
referred to in subparagraphs (viii)(C) and (D) of this
subsection;

(B) Twenty-five percent (25%) or more held
whenever the parties, natural persons or governments
referred to in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph are
acting in concert with respect to the interest even though
no single natural person, party or government holds an
interest of twenty-five percent (25%) or more;

(C) Twenty-five percent (25%) or more, in
the aggregate, held by natural persons, parties or
governments referred to in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph even though the natural persons, parties or
foreign governments may not be acting in concert;

(D) Less than twenty-five percent (25%), if
the natural person, party or government referred to in
SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph actually directs the
business and affairs of the party.

19-13-502. Critical infrastructure zones; reporting
of conveyances; investigations; rulemaking.

(d) Upon receiving a report from a county clerk under
subsection (c) of this section, the director and the
division of criminal investigation shall, upon reasonable
suspicion, investigate the conveyance to determine if the
conveyance involves a designated country or person foreign
adversary or if the conveyance poses a threat to national
or state security or to critical infrastructure. If a
conveyance requires approval by the office of homeland
security under W.S. 19-13-503 through 19-13-506, but
application has not been made, the director shall notify
all parties to the conveyance.

(e) The director, the attorney general and the
division of criminal investigation may take any action
authorized by law to determine the actual identity of any
party to a conveyance reported under this section if the
party's actual identity is not clear from the conveyance.
SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
Any investigation and information obtained during the
investigation shall remain confidential not be a public
record and shall not be open to public inspection but may
be released to any other state or federal governmental
entity when necessary to protect the public interest.

39-13-103. Imposition.

(b) Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

(viii) Every assessment schedule sent to a
taxpayer shall contain the property's estimated fair market
value for the current and previous year, or, productive
value in the case of agricultural property. The schedule
shall also contain the assessment ratio as provided by
paragraph (b)(iii) of this section for the taxable
property, the amount of taxes assessed on the taxable
property from the previous year, and an estimate of the
taxes which will be due and payable for the current year
based on the previous year's mill levies and, if the
property is a single family residential structure, an
estimate of the taxes that will be avoided if the property
is eligible for the exemptions under W.S.
SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
39-11-105(a)(xliii) and (xliv). The schedule shall also
contain a statement describing the requirement in W.S.
19-13-503 through 19-13-506 that a prohibited foreign party
shall apply to the office of homeland security to determine
if a conveyance of real property in the state of Wyoming is
located on, within or partially within a critical
infrastructure zone. The schedule shall contain a
statement of the process to contest assessments as
prescribed by W.S. 39-13-109(b)(i);

39-13-107. Compliance; collection procedures.

(b) The following provisions shall apply to the
payment of taxes, distraint of property and deferral:

(i) The following shall apply to the payment of
taxes due:

(C) Annually, on or before October 10 the
county treasurer shall send a written statement to each
taxpayer by mail at his last known address or, if offered
by the county and upon request of the taxpayer, by
electronic transmission of the total tax due, itemized as
SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
to property description, assessed value and mill levies.
The notice shall contain information, including contact
information, of any property tax relief program authorized
by state law and, if the property is a single family
residential structure, the taxes that will be avoided
pursuant to the exemptions under W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xliii)
and (xliv). The notice shall also contain a statement
describing the requirement in W.S. 19-13-503 through
19-13-506 that a prohibited foreign party shall apply to
the office of homeland security to determine if a
conveyance of real property in the state of Wyoming is
located on, within or partially within a critical
infrastructure zone. Failure to send notice, or to demand
payment of taxes, does not invalidate any taxes due;

Section 3.

(a) The office of homeland security is authorized up
to two (2) full-time positions for the purposes of this
act. It is the intent of the legislature that the office of
homeland security include these positions in its standard
budget request for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.
SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163

(b) There is appropriated two hundred nine thousand
eight hundred dollars ($209,800.00) from the general fund
to the office of homeland security for the positions
authorized in subsection (a) of this section and the
purposes of this act. This appropriation shall be for the
period beginning with the effective date of this section
and ending June 30, 2026. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2026. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation be doubled and included in the standard
budget request of the office of homeland security for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

SF0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0163
Section 4.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 through 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0076